apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="år__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bold__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cirk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ka/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tten</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttene</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="spi/l__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llet</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llene</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nø/d__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dden</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dder</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dderne</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ateist__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alibi__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sli/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kket</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kkene</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="spiller__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bistand"><i>bistand</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blotlæggelse"><i>blotlæggelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bombardering"><i>bombardering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="citrat"><i>citrat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dørkarm"><i>dørkarm</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erhvervsliv"><i>erhvervsliv</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erstatning"><i>erstatning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estragoneddike"><i>estragoneddike</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="futteral"><i>futteral</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="godkendelse"><i>godkendelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hovedbund"><i>hovedbund</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="husholdning"><i>husholdning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kat"><i>ka</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreditkort"><i>kreditkort</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kridthus"><i>kridthus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuldebølge"><i>kuldebølge</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lotteri"><i>lotteri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mediachef"><i>mediachef</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nød"><i>nø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="porse"><i>porse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portvin"><i>portvin</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relatering"><i>relatering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seksualhormon"><i>seksualhormon</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="signalhorn"><i>signalhorn</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skuldertaske"><i>skuldertaske</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søhest"><i>søhest</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spil"><i>spi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strækning"><i>strækning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tankangreb"><i>tankangreb</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telegrambureau"><i>telegrambureau</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troldeskov"><i>troldeskov</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urigtighed"><i>urigtighed</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="absorptionsevne"><i>absorptionsevne</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="livsnerve"><i>livsnerve</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barsl"><i>barsl</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klink"><i>klink</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sug"><i>sug</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feltstruktur"><i>feltstruktur</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dolk"><i>dolk</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medarbejderfond"><i>medarbejderfond</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udbetalingsdag"><i>udbetalingsdag</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antikvarboghand"><i>antikvarboghand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bimp"><i>bimp</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyk"><i>cyk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fist"><i>fist</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirt"><i>kirt</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meritoverførs"><i>meritoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pengeoverførs"><i>pengeoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skærmyds"><i>skærmyds</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktiebrev"><i>aktiebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dræn"><i>dræn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gavflab"><i>gavflab</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lærebrev"><i>lærebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="r"><i>r</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spir"><i>spir</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udråb"><i>udråb</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bådehus"><i>bådehus</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enkeltark"><i>enkeltark</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hangarskib"><i>hangarskib</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mindstekrav"><i>mindstekrav</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skab"><i>skab</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tiggerbrev"><i>tiggerbrev</i><par n="år__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amerikaner"><i>amerikaner</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bedstefader"><p><l>bedstefaderen</l><r>bedstefader</r></p><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dommer"><i>dommer</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="italiener"><i>italiener</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lejer"><i>lejer</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="psykiater"><i>psykiater</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slagter"><i>slagter</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tjener"><i>tjener</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
